Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 27 Control of Mass Gatherings

Cross references.

Regulation of operators of motor vehicle racetracks, T. 43, C. 25.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Mass gatherings, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Environmental Health Hazards, Subject 511-3-2.

31-27-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Mass gathering” means any event likely to attract 5,000 or more persons and to continue for 15 or more consecutive hours.

“Permit” means written authorization to a person by the department to operate a mass gathering.

“Person” means the state or any agency or institution thereof, any municipality, political subdivision, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, association, or other entity, and includes any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or public or private corporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1201a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1.

31-27-2.
Permit requirement.

No person shall hold or promote, by advertising or otherwise, a mass gathering unless a permit has been issued for the gathering. Such permits shall be issued by the Department of Public Health, shall be in writing, shall specify the conditions under which issued, and shall remain in effect until suspended or revoked or until the mass gathering is terminated. The permit shall not be transferable or assignable, and a separate permit shall be required for each mass gathering.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1202a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Issuance of permits by Department of Natural Resources for holding of boat races, marine parades, tournaments, and other events, §

52-7-19

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-27-3.
Application for permit.

Application for a permit to promote or hold a mass gathering shall be made to the department on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department by the person who will promote or hold the mass gathering. Application for a permit to promote or hold a mass gathering shall be made at least 15 days before the first day of advertising and at least 45 days before the first day of the gathering. Water and sewage facilities shall be constructed and operational not later than 48 hours before the first day of the mass gathering. The application shall be accompanied by such plans, reports, and specifications as the department shall deem necessary. The plans, reports, and specifications shall provide for adequate and satisfactory water supply and sewage facilities, adequate drainage, adequate toilet and lavatory facilities, adequate refuse storage and disposal facilities, adequate sleeping areas and facilities, wholesome food and sanitary food service, adequate medical facilities, insect control, adequate fire protection, and such other matters as may be appropriate for security of life or health. The application shall disclose the names and addresses of all of the persons, firms, or corporations providing financial backing to the mass gathering and the amounts of such backing.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1203a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1.

31-27-4.
Additional requirements for issuance of permit; denial, suspension, or revocation.

Prior to the issuance of a permit, the applicant must:

Provide a plan for limiting attendance, including methods of entering the area, number and location of ticket booths and entrances, and provisions for keeping nonticket holders out of the area;

Provide a statement verifying that all construction and installation of facilities, including water supply, sewage disposal, insect control, food service equipment, and garbage handling facilities, will be completed at least 48 hours prior to the commencement of the event;

Provide a detailed plan for food service, including a description of food sources, menu, mandatory use of single service dishes and utensils, refrigeration, and food handling and dispensing;

Provide a detailed plan for use of signs to locate all facilities and roadways;

Provide a statement from local fire and police authorities having jurisdiction over the area acknowledging that they can supply adequate security, traffic control, and law enforcement for the proposed gathering;

Provide a detailed plan for emergency situations covering:

Food supplies;

Medical supplies, facilities, and personnel;

An evacuation plan; and

Emergency access roads;

Provide a statement from the local civil defense director, if there is such an officer, indicating that he has been advised of the event and has approved the plan from a civil defense standpoint; and

Provide a command post to be used by department personnel consisting of a minimum of one building or trailer equipped with an adequate communication system.

If it appears necessary and proper that an application for a permit be denied or that a permit previously granted be suspended or revoked, the applicant or holder of the permit shall be notified thereof in writing and shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1204a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31.

31-27-5.
Bond requirement; cash deposit in lieu of bond.

The person holding or promoting a mass gathering shall provide a bond of $1 million issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state. The purpose of the bond shall be to guarantee full compliance with this chapter as well as other applicable provisions of this title and the provisions of Title 12, relating to air quality control and water supply quality control, and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder and to cover cleanup of the site. This bond shall be in favor of the state for the benefit of any person who is damaged as a result of the activity of a mass gathering. Any person claiming against the bond may maintain an action at law against the person holding or promoting the mass gathering and the surety. In lieu of furnishing the bond, the person holding or promoting a mass gathering may deposit with the commissioner a cash deposit in like amount. However, the bond specified in this Code section shall not be required in cases where the other requirements of this chapter are met by the applicant for a permit and an incorporated municipality or county owns the area upon which the mass gathering is to be held and commits itself, in writing, to clean up the site upon which the gathering is to be held.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1205a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 912, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-27-6.
Assessment for persons in attendance beyond number specified.

The person promoting or holding a mass gathering shall be assessed at the rate of $5.00 for each person in attendance beyond the number specified in the application for such mass gathering. Any such assessment shall be remitted to the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1206a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1.

31-27-7.
Emergency powers of Governor; authority of director of Civil Defense Division.

In the event the commissioner of public health determines that the various facilities appropriate for security of life or health are inadequate due to the unprecedented size of the mass gathering, failure of the person or persons responsible for providing facilities, services, and other requirements of this chapter, or for any other reason, the commissioner shall immediately inform the Governor who shall have general direction and control of the Civil Defense Division of the Department of Defense and may take whatever immediate action he deems necessary under the authority of Articles 1 through 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 38, as amended. Upon order of the Governor, the director of the Civil Defense Division shall, subject to the direction and control of the Governor, coordinate the activities of all organizations, agencies, and persons required to protect the health, safety, and general welfare of the public in the manner prescribed by Articles 1 through 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 38, as amended.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1207a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding emergency powers of Governor, §§

38-2-6

,

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

,

45-12-29

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-27-8.
Recovery by state for costs and damages.

Any department or agency of the state which assumes the obligations of any person who has defaulted under this chapter may maintain an action at law to recover actual costs and damages suffered against the person holding or promoting a mass gathering, or one who defaults in the performance of an obligation. All damages recovered under this Code section, including, without limitation, the value of goods and services expended in behalf of one who has defaulted under this chapter, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the department or agency which suffered such expense. Actions to recover costs and damages under this Code section shall be brought in the superior court in the county in which the cause of action or some part thereof arose, or in which the person complained of has a principal place of business, or in which the person complained of resides. In all such actions, the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1208a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1.

31-27-9.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may appear necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1209a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1.

31-27-10.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to:

Any mass gathering which is to be held in any regularly established permanent place of worship, athletic field, auditorium, coliseum, or other similar permanently established building within the maximum seating capacity;

Fairs and similar industrial-agricultural exhibitions which have been in existence for at least five consecutive years prior to July 1, 1971; or

Religious gatherings that are held for no more than seven days.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 2.

31-27-11.
Civil penalty.

Any person who is found by any agency or department after a hearing to have violated any provision of this chapter or duly promulgated supplementary rules and regulations or failed, neglected, or refused to comply with any final or emergency order of any agency or department acting under authority of this chapter shall be liable to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000.00 nor more than $10,000.00 for such violation. Each day of violation shall be considered a separate offense.

Any person penalized under this Code section shall be entitled to judicial review. All hearings and proceedings for judicial review under this Code section shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” All penalties and interest recovered by such agency or department as provided in this Code section, together with the cost thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1210a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-27-12.
Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1211a, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 252, § 1.